docker/build/vendor/latexprinter/texlive/texmf-dist/tex/generic/hyph-utf8/patterns/txt/hyph-hsb.hyp.txt
War-sza-wa
do-zna
njej-sym
njej-sy
nje-je
njej-smój
njej-staj
njej-stej
njej-smy
njej-sće
njej-su
pźede
pźe-derje
tkalc
njeńdź
ze-tnu
ze-tnješ
ze-tnje
ze-tnje-mój
ze-tnje-taj
ze-tnje-tej
ze-tnje-my
ze-tnje-će
wote-tnu
wote-tnješ
wote-tnje
wote-tnje-mój
wote-tnje-taj
wote-tnje-tej
wote-tnje-my
wote-tnje-će
wo-dnjo
wo-snje
tak-rjec
